BrailleTables/de.ctb
# the letter n
always n 1345
always N 1345
word nachdem 1345-145
always nahm 1345-134 Annahme
contraction nm
always natur 1345-2345
contraction nt
always natürlich 1345-456
always nächst 1345-23456
always nehm 1345-125
contraction nh
endword nisch 1345-24-156 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
endword nische 1345-24-156-15 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
endword nischen 1345-24-156-14 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
endword nischer 1345-24-156-12456 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
endword nisches 1345-24-156-123456 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
word nicht 1345
always nicht 2-1345
always nichtig 1345-45
always nichts 1345-234
contraction ns
always nichtsehend 2-1345-234-2356-14-145 shouldn't use the nichts-contraction
midendword nis 1346
always noch 1345-1456
always nommen 1345-1346
contraction nx
always notwendig 2456-1345
contraction nw
always normal 1345-35-134-1-123 We shouldn't use the mal-contraction here
always nur 1345-1235
contraction nr
always nutz 1345-1356
contraction nz
always nütz 5-1345-1356

# the letter o
always o 135
always O 135
word oder 135
sufword ohne 135-15
contraction oe
endword ommen 1346
always or 26

# the letter ö
always ö 246
always Ö 246
always öffentlich 246-456

# the letter p
always p 1234
always P 1234
always paar = shouldn't use the ar-contraction
always paragraph 1234-1245
contraction pg
always person 1234-1345
contraction pn
always philosoph 1234-125
contraction ph
always platz 1234-1356
always plätz 5-1234-1356
always plötzlich 1234-456
always politik 1234-13
contraction pk
always politisch 1234-156
begword pro 12345
always punkt 1234-2345
contraction pt

# the letter q
always q 6-12345
always Q 6-12345

# the letter r
always r 1235
always R 1235
always recht 1235-2345
contraction rt
always regier 1235-1245
contraction rg
before s always regierungs 1235-1245-136-234
always rehabilit 1235-125
contraction rh
always republik 1235-13
contraction rk
sufword rest 1235-15-23456 should use the st-contraction
always richt 2-3456
always rück 1235-46

# the letter s
always s 234
always S 234
always sag 234-1245
contraction sg
always saal = shouldn't use the al-contraction
midendword sam 2346
word samen 234-1-134-14 shouldn't use the sam-contraction
always samstag =
always satz 234-1356
contraction sz
always sätz 5-234-1356
always sch 156
midendword schaft 156
always schnur 156-1345-136-1235 shouldn't use the nur-contraction
word schon 156
always school 234-1456-135-135-123 foreign word, sch-contraction not allowed
always schlag 234-1245
contraction sg
always schläg 5-234-1245
always schließ 156-2346
always schreib 156-12
always schrieb 2-156
always schwierig 156-45
always schwillt 156-2456-24-12345-2345 shouldn't use the will-contraction
always schwoll 156-2456-135-12345 geschwollen shouldn't use the woll-contraction
word sehr 234-1235
sufword versehr 36-234-1235
sufword unversehr 256-1236-12456-234-1235
always selbst 234-23456
always selbständig 234-13456-12-5-23456-45 shouldn't use the selbst-contraction
sufword sesam 234-123456-1-134 shouldn't use the sam-contraction
always tzung 2345-1356-136 auseinandersetzung shouldn't use the zu-contraction
word sich 14
wors sie 234
always sind 234-145
contraction sd
always sitz 2-24
word so 1234
always so 2-1234
word soda = shouldn't use the so-contraction
always solch 234-1456
always soll 2-234
always sondern 234-1345
contraction sn
always sonst 234-135-1345-23456 shouldn't use the so-contraction
always sozial 234-123
contraction sl
always spiel 2-346
always sprach 234-1234
contraction sp
always spräch 5-234-1234
always sprech 2-2346
always ss 2346
always st 23456
always staat 23456-2345
always stand 2-23456
always ständ 5-23456
always sth = Anästhesie
always stell 2-13456
word stets 23456-234
always strahier 23456-1235-1-125-346-1235 abstrahieren

# the letter ß
always ß 6-2346

# the letter t
always t 2345
always T 2345
word tages 2345-1-1245-123456 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
word taiga = shouldn't use the ig-contraction
always täter 2345-345-2345-12456 shouldn't use the er-contraction
midendword te 236
always technik 2345-13
contraction tk
always technisch 2345-156
always teich 2345-146-3456 shouldn't use the te-contraction
midendword teil 2345-146-123 shouldn't use the te-contraction
endword ten 2345-14
endword ter 2345-12456
word tennis 2345-14-1345-24-234 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
sufword test 2345-15-23456 shouldn't use the es-contraction
sufword töricht 2345-246-1235-3456-2345 shouldn't use the richt-contraction
always trag 2345-1245
contraction tg
always träg 5-2345-1245
always train = training shouldn't use the first possible in-contraction
always treff 2345-124
contraction tf
always trinitro = shouldn't use the in-contraction
always trotz 2345-1356
contraction tz
always trüb = trüber shouldn't use the über-contraction

# the letter u
always u 136
always U 136
always un 256
always unbeirr 256-23-24-1235-1235 unbeirrt shouldn't use the bei-contraction
word und 136
midendword ung 136
word unter 256
begmidword unter 2-256

# the letter ü
always ü 1256
always Ü 1256
word über 1256
always über 2-1256
word überhaupt 1256-125
always übrig 1256-45

# the letter v
always v 1236
always V 1236
begword ver 36
always verhältnis 1236-125
contraction vh
always viel 1236-123
contraction vl
word vielleicht 1236-2345
always volk 1236-13
contraction vk
always voll 2-12345
word vom 1236-134
always von 2-1236
always vor 2-26

# the letter w
always w 2456
always W 2456
always wahr 2456-125
contraction wh
always währ 5-2456-125
midendword wärts 2456
always während 345-145
contraction äd
sufword war 356
sufword wär 5-356
word was 2456
always weg 2456-1245
contraction wg
always weis 2-146 Anweisung
always weit 2456-2345
sufword welch 13456
word wie 126
always wenig 2456-45
sufword wenn 2456-1345
contraction wn
always werd 2-2456
always wesentlich 2456-456
word wie 126
always wie 2-126
always wieder 346-145
always wien 2456-346-1345 shouldn't use the wie-contraction
always will 2456-12345
word wir 2456-1235
word wird 2456-145
always wirk 2456-13
contraction wk
word wirst 2456-23456
always wirtschaft 2456-156
always wiss 2456-2346
contraction wß
always wohl 2456-123
contraction wl
always woll 2-135
word worden 135-14
sufword wurd 136
sufword würd 1256

# the letter x
always x 6-1346
always X 6-1346

# the letter y
always y 6-13456
always Y 6-13456
always young 6-13456-135-136-1345-1245 shouldn't use the u-contraction

# the letter z
always z 1356
always Z 1356
always zahl 1356-123
contraction zl
always zähl 5-1356-123
always zeit 1356-2345
contraction zt
word zu 1356
contraction z
always zu 2-1356
word zum 1356-134
word zunächst 1356-1345
word zur 1356-1235
sufword zurschau 1356-1235-156-16
sufword zurück 1356-46
always zusammen 1356-234
always zwischen 1356-2456
contraction zw

# common abbreviations
word GmbH 46-1245-134-12-45-125

# names
always daniela 145-235-24-15-123-1 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
always gerlinde 1245-12456-123-35-145-15 shouldn't use the ge-contraction

always é 4-15

prepunc " 236
postpunc " 356
always " 6-4

always ' 6-6

prepunc `` 236
always ` 4

midnum ^ 45
always ^ 456-126

always ~ 4-156
repeatable ~~~ 4-156-4-156-4-156

midnum , 2
always , 2

always ; 23

midnum : 25
always : 25
repeatable ::: 25-25-25

midnum . 3
always . 3
always ... 3-3-3
always .\s.\s. 3-3-3 . . .

endnum ! 12346 (factorial)
always ! 235

always ? 26

always ( 2356
always ) 2356

always [ 456-12356
always ] 456-23456

always { 46-12356
always } 46-23456

always # 3456

midnum * 35
always * 6-35
repeatable *** 6-35-35-35

midnum / 256
always / 5-2

endnum % 123456
always % 6-123456

always & 6-12346

always @ 3457

always \\ 347

always | 6-34

repeatable \s 0
repeatable \t 0
repeatable \xa0 0 no break space

repeatable --- 36-36-36

always _ 4567
repeatable ___ 4567-4567

repeatable === 6-2356-2356-2356

# the hyphen
midendword - 36
always - 6-36
#repeatable ­­­ 6-36-36-36

# mathematical symbols
always < 5-13
always = 2356
always > 46-2
midnum + 235
always + 346
midnum - 36
always × 46-16 multiplication sign
midnum ÷ 46-34 division sign
begnum $ 256
always $ 256-3456

# other special characters
always © 2356-6-14-2356 copyright
always ¶ 4-1234-345 paragraph
always § 4-234-3 section
always ° 45-46-16 degrees
always ¢ 4-14 cents
always £ 4-123 pounds
always ¥ 4-13456 yen
always µ 46-134 mu

# special character sequences
literal :// URLs
literal www.

literal .com
literal .edu
literal .gov
literal .mil
literal .net
literal .org
include countries.cti

literal .doc
literal .htm
literal .html
literal .tex
literal .txt

literal .gif
literal .jpg
literal .png
literal .wav

literal .tar
literal .zip

# When an upper-case letter occurs inside a contraction, following a lower-case
# letter, the contraction should not be used. Example McCan

# when a decimal begins with a period, it should be translated with a 
# number sign followed by a decimal point, followed by the number.
